trunk/incubator/da.olddic.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ÀÁÂÄÅÆÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖØÙÚÛÜàáâäåæçèéêëìíîïñòóôöøùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="ut"/>
    <sdef n="un"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>

    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"/>
    <sdef n="pri"/>
    <sdef n="past"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>

    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="subj"/>
    <sdef n="obj"/>

    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>

    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
  </sdefs>



  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="cirk/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>len</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ler</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lerne</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>   
    <pardef n="bold__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ateist__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="alibi__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="abe__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/and__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ænderne</l>
          <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ænder</l>
          <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anden</l>
          <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>and</l>
          <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/ader__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aderen</l>
          <r>ader<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ader</l>
          <r>ader<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ædrene</l>
          <r>ader<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ædre</l>
          <r>ader<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="snab/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elen</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>len</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lerne</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ler</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="treer__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sodavand__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e(r)ne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/od__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ødderne</l>
          <r>od<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ødder</l>
          <r>od<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oden</l>
          <r>od<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>od</l>
          <r>od<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="annoncekampagne"><i>annoncekampagne</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bedekølle"><i>bedekølle</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bobslæde"><i>bobslæde</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="byggelinje"><i>byggelinje</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dødsfjende"><i>dødsfjende</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="etape"><i>etape</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="frakkelomme"><i>frakkelomme</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="idømmelse"><i>idømmelse</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="læplante"><i>læplante</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="opgave"><i>opgave</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="romboide"><i>romboide</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slåmaskine"><i>slåmaskine</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="studine"><i>studine</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trykkabine"><i>trykkabine</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ank"><i>ank</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barneansigt"><i>barneansigt</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="boldtræ"><i>boldtræ</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="crepepapir"><i>crepepapir</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="driftsregnskab"><i>driftsregnskab</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fallitbo"><i>fallitbo</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fold"><i>fold</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gækkeri"><i>gækkeri</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kancelli"><i>kancelli</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mål"><i>mål</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prismærk"><i>prismærk</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skar"><i>skar</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stempel"><i>stempel</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trækgardin"><i>trækgardin</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alpinist"><i>alpinist</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barselpatient"><i>barselpatient</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bowl"><i>bowl</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="deklamation"><i>deklamation</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="efterladenskab"><i>efterladenskab</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fiasko"><i>fiasko</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="frasering"><i>frasering</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hawaiiblomst"><i>hawaiiblomst</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jurisdiktion"><i>jurisdiktion</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kreditering"><i>kreditering</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="opprioritering"><i>opprioritering</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rododendron"><i>rododendron</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stabelafløbning"><i>stabelafløbning</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trykimprægnering"><i>trykimprægnering</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bælg"><i>bælg</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="boligvej"><i>boligvej</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dejkrog"><i>dejkrog</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="favn"><i>favn</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fredag"><i>fredag</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="harddisk"><i>harddisk</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kamgavl"><i>kamgavl</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="levevej"><i>levevej</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="offentlighedslov"><i>offentlighedslov</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="redningskrans"><i>redningskrans</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="serpentinevej"><i>serpentinevej</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slædehund"><i>slædehund</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="svenskekrig"><i>svenskekrig</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vang"><i>vang</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="antikvarboghand"><i>antikvarboghand</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="avisartik"><i>avisartik</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bimp"><i>bimp</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bræddestab"><i>bræddestab</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cyk"><i>cyk</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dataoverførs"><i>dataoverførs</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fist"><i>fist</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grundreg"><i>grundreg</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kirt"><i>kirt</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kørs"><i>kørs</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="meritoverførs"><i>meritoverførs</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="musk"><i>musk</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pengeoverførs"><i>pengeoverførs</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="retsreg"><i>retsreg</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="snørk"><i>snørk</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
